Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 2

Popularly Elected City Judges

16-18-201. Ordinances — Election.

Any incorporated city or town may by ordinance provide for the election of a city judge or judges by popular vote. The popular election of the judge or judges may be an alternative to the method provided in the charter or applicable general law provisions or in addition to that method, with one (1) or more judges being chosen under charter or applicable general law provisions and one (1) or more being chosen by popular vote pursuant to this part. In the election for city judge, only qualified voters of the city or town may vote.

Acts 1993, ch. 115, § 1.

Cross-References. Forfeiture warrant, § 40-33-204.

Cited: City of White House v. Whitley, 979 S.W.2d 262, 1998 Tenn. LEXIS 573 (Tenn. 1998).

16-18-202. Qualifications.

Any city judge elected by popular vote must meet the requirements established in Tenn. Const. art. VI, § 4 for judges of inferior courts.

Acts 1993, ch. 115, § 1.

Cited: City of White House v. Whitley, 979 S.W.2d 262, 1998 Tenn. LEXIS 573 (Tenn. 1998).

16-18-203. Term of office.

The term of office of the city judge elected pursuant to this part shall be eight (8) years, except for any initial term that may be shorter. Once the ordinance is adopted providing for the popularly elected judge, the municipal governing body may appoint a qualified person to serve in that position until the next regular August general state election. The first city judge popularly elected pursuant to this part shall be elected at the next regular August general state election that takes place at least thirty (30) days after the ordinance is passed calling for the judge's election. The person elected at this election shall serve only until replaced by a successor to be chosen at the next regular judicial election held in accordance with Tenn. Const. art. VII, § 5. All subsequent elections for city judge pursuant to this part shall be held in accordance with Tenn. Const. art. VII, § 5.

Acts 1993, ch. 115, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. “City election” under city charter construed as November elections, OAG 98-0103 (6/8/98).

A former city judge was not entitled to salary or benefits, including payment by the city for COBRA coverage, after the successor assumed office where the judge was originally elected to a term that would have ended in April 2001, but the law mandating the election time for city judge was changed after the judge took office, and the judge's successor took office on September 1, 2000, OAG 01-006 (1/10/01).

16-18-204. Vacancies.

A vacancy in the office of the popularly elected city judge shall be filled by appointment by the governing body. The person appointed, however, may serve only until the next regular August general state election. At this election, a person shall be elected to serve any unexpired term if the full term is not to be filled at the election. In the temporary absence or inability of the city judge, the governing body shall appoint a qualified person to serve until the judge's return.

Acts 1993, ch. 115, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. “City election” under city charter construed as November elections, OAG 98-0103 (6/8/98).

16-18-205. Salary.

The salary of the popularly elected city judge shall be established in one (1) of the following ways:

The salary may be fixed by the governing body by ordinance or resolution prior to the term of office and shall not be increased nor diminished during the term;

The salary shall be set in private act or general law charter provisions or other general law provisions applicable to the particular city or town. Present salary provisions in charters that are applicable to nonpopularly elected city judges may be used for popularly elected judges, and may be amended from time to time as long as the salary is neither increased nor diminished during the term of office.

If there is no charter or general law provision applicable to the particular city or town setting the city judge's salary, the salary of the popularly elected judge shall be as follows:

Municipalities with a population of 100,000 or more $2,000 per month.

Municipalities with a population of 25,000 to 99,999 1,000 per month.

Municipalities with a population less than 25,000 500 per month.

All populations shall be as determined by the latest federal census. This salary shall prevail until a different one is set for the city or town by charter or general law. This salary, however, may not be increased nor diminished during a term of office. The salary of the popularly elected city judge shall be paid monthly from the general fund of the city or town.

Except as otherwise provided in this section relative to the salary of the popularly elected judge, the city governing body shall set the annual budget of the city court.

Acts 1993, ch. 115, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities see Volume 13 and its supplement.

16-18-206. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-18-206 (Acts 1993, ch. 115, § 1), concerning jurisdiction of city judges, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 6(f), effective March 1, 2005.

16-18-207. City court clerk — Election — Term of office — Duties — Removal — Vacancies.

The municipal governing body may by ordinance require the city court clerk serving the popularly elected city judge to be elected by the voters of the city or town for a term of four (4) years. The elected clerk may be an alternative or in addition to the court clerk provided for by charter. The initial term may be a transitional term established by ordinance to make the clerk's election coincide at every other election with the election of the city judge. The elected clerk shall perform the duties set out in the charter and ordinances of the city or town for the city court clerk.

The elected clerk may be removed by the city judge:

Upon conviction of a misdemeanor in office or of a felony;

For failing to give security as required by law or ordinance;

For failing to pay over public moneys or moneys collected officially;

For incapacity, neglect of duty or misbehavior in office; or

For any other cause to which the penalty of removal is attached by law.

A vacancy in the office of the elected city court clerk may be filled temporarily by appointment by the city judge until the next regular municipal or general election. At this election, a person shall be elected to serve any unexpired term if the full term is not to be filled at the election.

If a city or town chooses to have an elected clerk but does not wish to elect a city court clerk specifically for the city or town, the clerk of the general sessions court in the county may by agreement with the city or town serve as the clerk of the city court.

Acts 1993, ch. 115, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. “City election” under city charter construed as November elections, OAG 98-0103 (6/8/98).